Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1004
Overvote; rejection; when.

If a ballot has been overvoted for any office, the ballot shall be rejected for that office only. No overvoted ballot shall be judged for voter intent by any member of the counting board or any official involved in the counting process.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 298;

Laws 2007, LB646, § 11.